Botlikh.lexd
LEXICON Word
абаро́на
абйавле́ни
або́рт
абта́бус
абтама́т
абтару́чка
абте́ка
ава́нс
ава́ри
автабиогра́пи
автама́т
автамаби́л
автамаши́на
автару́чка
авто́бус
авча́рка
агаро́д
аграно́м
аграно́млъи
адвака́т
адвака́тлъи
адде́л
адделе́ни
адделе́нийа
адийа́л
адикало́н
адино́чка
ака́ци
акиа́н
ако́п
актебрёнок
актябир
аку́ла
акупа́нт
акупа́ци
алiи́чник
албо́м
алжи́рав
алиме́нт
алипула́н
алма́с
алпа́вит
амана́л
амбулато́ри
америка́лъи
америка́нав
амни́си
ансса́мбил
анте́на
апара́т
апилси́н
апице́р
апициа́нка
апре́л
апте́ка
апте́кар
апщи́ти
аре́нда
арипме́тика
арке́стр
арте́л
арти́ска
арти́слъи
арти́ст
асати́нав
асати́най
асати́нал
асва́лт
асети́нав
асети́най
асети́нал
аста́вка
ата́ка
атве́рка
атиста́т
аткри́тка
атли́чник
атре́з
ацта́вка
ацта́вкалъиссу
ачки́балъи
ачко́
аччо́т
ба́за
ба́ни
ба́нк/а
ба́нка
баглажа́н
бак
бака́л
баклажа́н
бала́нк
бала́т
балала́йка
балга́рав
балга́рай
балга́рал
балга́ралуб
балга́рка
балза́м
бални́ца
бало́н
балшиви́к
бана́н
бандеро́л
банк
банке́т
бара́к
башки́рав
башки́рай
башки́рал
башки́ралуб
башлу́хъ
башма́к
белару́са=в
белару́са=й
белару́са=л
белару́сав
белару́сай
белару́сал
белги́йца=в
белги́йца=й
белги́йца=л
беле́т
бензаво́з
бензи́н
бето́н
биле́т
билиа́рд
бинзи́н
бинт
бирга́да
биргади́р
биргади́рлъи
бирзе́нт
бири́тур
биро́
бис
бито́н
биту́н
бо́мба
болшеви́кiалуб
бор/о́
боро́
борш
бу́лка
булдо́вузир
булете́н
бупе́т
буржу́й
бурйа́та=л
бурти́йа=в
бурцило́з
буцiцiа́лъитохтур
ва́за
ва́линка
ва́пли
ва́рвар
ва́хьмистир
вагза́л
вагу́н
ваз(и)ли́н
вазга́л
вазили́н
вазли́н
вайнкама́т
вайнко́м
вакци́на
валибо́л
валс
ванна
вара́ч
варата́р
варача́лъи
варе́ни
васка
васкре́сник
васпита́тел
васта́ни
ватiалъи́
ве́домост
ве́рмут
ве́чер
веер
веласапе́т
венге́рал
вермише́л
верталёт
ветеран
вече́рникi
взнос
ви́брион
ви́варка
ви́дра
ви́лка
ви́рус
ви́ски
ви́ставка
виговор
видра́
винегре́т
вино́
винтилятор
витами́н
вйетна́май
вйетна́мал
вйетна́малуб
во́лтметр
во́лфрам
во́тка
водоро́д
вожд
волт
вулка́н
гiапи́цер
гiапи́церлъи
гiаршин
гiу́йчай
га́йка
га́лупци
га́луска
га́мма
газ
газе́т
галаго́л
галип/е́
галипе́
галипе́барта
гамарди́н
гара́дус
гара́ж
гара́жданин
гара́жданинлъи
гара́м
гарама́тика
гарана́та
гарани́т
гарапи́н
гарапи́т
гаре́лка
гарни́р
гарниту́р
гарчи́ца
гарчи́чник
гасти́ница
гастри́т
гатава́лни
гекта́р
генарали́ссимус
геогра́пийа
герб
гере́кай
гере́кал
гере́калу=б
гере́лка
геро́й
геъаме́трийа
ги́ра
гилицери́н
гимн
гимна́зи
гимнази́ст
гипс
гири́п
гита́ра
го́спитал
гол
голо́бус
горко́м
горо́зни
гу́зер
гу́сле
гуаш
губе́рни
гулуши́тел
гулюко́за
гупва́хта
гуру́па
гъаза́х
гъаза́халуб
да́ма
да́мба
да́ча
дайа́рка
дайа́ркалъи
дакла́д
даку́мент
дакуме́нт
дакумента́ци
дамкра́т
дапро́с
дара́нка
дара́п
даск/а́
даска́
дахо́д
даце́нт
дед-маро́з
дедо́м
дежу́рни
декре́т
делега́т
делега́ций(а)
демократически
демонстра́ци
депута́т
депута́тлъи
дере́ктор
дере́кторлъи
дере́л
джаз
джанда́рма
дже́мпир
джем
джурнал
ди́вирсант
ди́караци
ди́ктор
ди́намит
ди́пламат
ди́пламататлъи
ди́птири
ди́ска
диа́гноз
дива́н
диве́рси
диви́зи
дизинтири́
дийе́та
дика́бир
дика́н
диклара́ци
дикре́т
дикта́нт
дикта́тор
дилига́т
дилига́ци
дина́мик
диневни́к
дипло́м
дипута́т
дире́ктор
дире́кторлъи
дире́кци
диржа́бил
дирижо́р
дирижо́рлъи
диса́нт
диску́си
дисссерта́ци
дицци́метра
до́лар
домино́
доро́блiи
дороб
дра́ма
ду́ржина
дублика́т
дуржи́никi
душ
дуъе́л
жа́брабалъи
железобето́н
жиге́тк/а
жира́па
жу́ликi
жури́
журна́л
журнали́ст
за́вуч
за́вучлъи
за́дникi
за́йм/а
за́йма
за́кса
за́мша
заате́хник
забо́р
заве́дущи
заведе́ни
заво́д
завхо́з
зага́р
загато́вка
загс
зада́чник
зажига́лка
зажига́ни
зака́з
зака́лка
зако́н
закони́йа/б
заку́сачни
заку́ска
зал
зама́ска
замести́тел
замика́ни
замисти́тил
зао́чни
зао́чник
запа́с
запито́й
запра́вка
запрос
заседа́ни
захва́чик
зачи́нщик
заччо́т
заявле́ни
зберка́сса
зберкини́шка
зе́бра
зелёнка
зени́тка
зени́чик
зибизда́
зооло́ги
игза́мен
игза́мин
игру́шка
изба-чита́лни
избира́тел
извано́к
извено́
извено́д
извище́ни
изда́ча
излаже́ни
изна́к
изначо́к
ийу́л
ийу́н
икра́
иле́ктрик
илектраста́нци
иликтри́чиски
имвали́д
имигра́нт
импе́ри
импирали́зм
импирали́ст
инде́йцав
инде́йцай
инде́йцал
инде́йцалуб
инджи́нер
инджи́нерлъи
индоне́зийалъи
инду́сав
инду́сай
инду́сал
инжине́р
инжине́рлъи
инситу́т
инспе́ктор
инспе́кторлъи
инспе́кци
институ́т
интелеге́нт
интере́с
интере́сийа=б
интере́слiи
интере́сни
интилиге́нтлiи
интирве́нт
интирна́т
инфа́кт
ири́с
ирла́ндав
ирла́ндай
ирла́ндал
ирла́ндалуб
исби́шка
иск
иска́тир
искава́тор
искала́д
искаме́йка
иску́ство
исла́ндав
исла́ндай
исла́ндал
исла́ндалуб
ислава́р
исле́довани
исле́довател
исле́дователски
испа́нав
испа́най
испа́нал
испа́налуб
испа́нийал
испа́равка
испалко́м
испара́вка
испи́рт
испи́сок
испи́шка
испита́ни
иста́ж
иста́ка/н
иста́кан
иста́нци
иста́нцийа
иста́ршина
истадио́н
истали́ца
истало́й
истара́х
истатйа́
истилйа́га
истипе́нди
исто́ри
исто́рийа
исто́рик
исто́рож
истрапил
истриби́тел
истудет
ита́лийалуб
итаже́рка
италийа́нав
италийа́най
италийа́нцал
италийал
ихтио́л
ишка́б
ишла́нг
ишлйапа
ишну́р
ишпага́т
ишпарга́лка
ишпи́лка
ишпио́н
ишпио́нлъи
ишпри́цц
ишта́мп
ишта́пел
иштара́п
ишти́к
йа́сл/и
йа́сли
йа́шикi
йа́щур
йанва́р
йапони́йав
йапони́йай
йапони́йал
йапони́йалуб
йо́далъи
йо́доформа
йо́лка
йод
йу́бк/а
йуг
йури́ст
йуриди́чиски
йусти́ци
кiа́пiлигъвана
ка́бил
ка́дра
ка́ктус
ка́мира
ка́пидра
ка́псул
ка́рт/а
ка́рта
ка́рцер
ка́ска
ка́сс/а
ка́сса
каапера́тор
каапера́ци
кааперати́в
каби́на
каби́нка
кабине́т
кабирко́т
каварти́ра
кавбо́й
кавирко́тилъи
кавучу́к
каза́кал
каза́хал
казе́т
кази́рка
кала́виш
кала́пан
кала́с
кала́салъи
каладо́вка
каларне́т
калбаса́
кале́кцир
калесса
кали́бир
кали́т
каликти́в
калинда́р
калми́кал
кало́ни
кало́ш
калониали́зм
калониза́тор
калсонде́
калу́ш
калхо́з
калхо́зник
калхо́зникi
калцо́
калълъе́т
каляска
кама́нда
кама́ндар
кама́ндовани
камандиро́вка
камба́йин
камба́йн
камба́йнер
камба́йнерлъи
камбико́рма
камбина́т
камбина́ц/и
каме́ди
ками́си
каминда́нт
камиса́р
камисио́нни
камите́т
камо́д
кампа́ни
кампази́тор
кампи́т
кампли́кт
камплиме́нт
кампо́т
камсамо́л
камсамо́лиц
камсо́рг
каму́на
камуна́лни
камуна́р
камуни́зм
камуни́ст
камуни́сталуб
кана́дцав
кана́дцай
кана́дцал
кана́дцалуб
кана́л
канализа́ци
канве́рт
канво́й
кангре́с
кандида́т
канду́ктор
кани́кулде
кани́куллъи
канйа́к
канки́
кансе́рва
кансе́ру
кансила́р
кансирвато́ри
канспе́кт
канститу́ци
кансулта́ци
канте́йнир
канто́ра
кантраба́нда
кантрабанди́\ст
кантрало́р
кантрибу́ци
кантро́лни
канфере́нци
канце́рт
канцилiр
канцитрацио́ни
канцла́гер
капе́к
капе́ки
капи́лка
капи́тан
капита́л
капита́н
капитали́зм
капитали́ст
капишо́н
капро́н
капронде́
капу́ста
капу́т
кара́ват
кара́вт
кара́н
кара́нт
кара́ска
каранти́н
карахма́л
кардо́н
карду́м
каре́йав
каре́йай
каре́йал
каре́ктор
карешо́к
карзи́на
карзи́нка
каридо́р
карикату́ра
кариспанде́нт
карни́з
карни́стир
каро́бка
каро́л
каро́нка
карту́шка
касе́та
каси́нка
каси́чка
касми́чески
касси́р
касту́м
кату́ша
кату́шка
ква́ртал
кварти́ра
квас
ке́те
кепка
кере́м
кере́мли
кере́пдашин
кере́ст
кереди́т
ки́лка
ки́тел
кивита́нци
кил/о́
киламе́тра
кили́зма
килийонка
кило́
кило́метра
килёнка
кимано́
кини́шка
кино́
киноактёр
киноапара́т
кио́ск
кирага́з
кираси́нка
кири́зис
киримдиши́н
кирпи́ч
кисе́т
кисларо́д
кислата́
кита́йав
кита́йай
кита́йал
кита́йалуб
китайай
ко́жинка
ко́йка
ко́клуш
ко́мпас
ко́них
ко́пи
ко́пийа
ко́пта
ко́ржик
коно́пка
контразве́дчик
контразведка
контревалюционе́р
коре́йал
коре́йанав
коре́йанай
ку́бок
ку́зов
ку́колни
ку́ржа
ку́рпа
ку́рсе
ку́ртка
ку́хни
куба́нав
куба́най
кула́к
кула́калуб
кула́клъи
култпахо́д
култу́ра
култу́ралiи
кулу́б
кулу́мба
кулуб
купа́лник
купе́
купи́никi
купле́т
купу́никi
куржо́к
куро́рт
куро́рталъи́ссу
курп/а́
курс
курса́нт
куру́шка
куружо́к
куха́рка
къира́л
ла́вка
ла́гир
ла́мпа
ла́мпушка
ла́твийалуб
лак
ларёк
латаре́
лати́н
лати́шав
лати́шай
лати́шал
лати́шалуб
лато́
лато́са\лъи
лауриа́т
ле́йка
ле́ктар
ле́кци
ле́ниниб
ле́нта
ле́тра
лезги́йал
лезги́нав
лезги́най
лезги́нал
лезги́налуб
лезги́нка
лека́л
ленини́зма
ли́же
ли́па
ли́пта
ли́тр/а
лийо́чик
ликвида́тар
ликвида́тарлъи
ликвида́ци
ликёр
лимана́д
лимо́н
лине́йка
лино́лиум
лист
листо́вка
литина́нт
литирату́ра
лито́вцав
лито́вцай
лито́вцал
лито́вцалуб
личе́бница
ло́зунг
лёчик
ма́йатник
ма́йка
ма́нка
ма́рганиц
ма́ркiа
ма́рли
ма́ршал
ма́ска
ма́стер
ма́узер
мавзале́й
мага́зин
магна́т
магнитапо́н
мада́м
маз
май
майо́р
макаро́н
макинто́ш
макъла́шка
мала́р
малалитра́жка
малалитра́жни
малдава́нав
малдава́най
малдава́нал
мампаси́р
манга́л
манго́лав
манго́лай
манго́лал
манго́лалуб
мандали́на
мандари́н
мантёр
мара́мор
маргари́н
марина́д
маркси́зм-ленини́зма
маркси́зма
маркси́ст
маркси́сталуб
марма́р
мармала́д
маро́жа
маро́жени
март
марш
маршру́т
марщ
маслабо́йка
масса́ж
мастерско́й
мат
матаци́к
матаци́ки
матима́тик
мато́р
матори́ст
матро́с
мату́шка
махху́рка
мача́лка
маши́на
маши́нка
машина́балъигьир
машини́ст
ме́бел
ме́дбаб\а
ме́тра
ме́тралъи
ме́трика
медици́на
мел
меншеви́к
метро́
меха́никi
механи́зм
механи́змалъи
механиза́тор
механиза́ци
ми́на
ми́тинг
мида́л
микрапо́нилъи
микраско́п
микрафо́н
микро́п
мили́метра
мили́ц
мили́ци
милиа́рд
милио́н
милионе́р
миллиа́рд
миллио́н
мини́стер
мини́стир
министе́рство
мину́т
мину́талъи
минуталъи́
минуте́ру-минута́
минуте́ру-минута́ссуб
мо́да
мо́далъагъи
мо́рг
мо́рпи
му́зика
му́шка
мужи́кi
мужи́кiццу
музе́й
музика́нт
мунапис
мунди́р
мушту́кi
набо́йка
нало́г
направле́ни
наптали́н
нарза́н
нарко́з
наси́лка
насо́с
нату́ра
нау́шник
нацци́зм
нацци́ст
нача́лникi
нача́лникiибццуб
нача́лникiлъи
нача́лникiлъунлъо
начо́с
не́грав
не́грай
не́грал
не́мцав
не́мцай
не́мцал
не́мцалуб
не́рва
нейло́н
ни́кил
ни́кри
никати́н
но́мир
но́рм/а
но́рма
но́рмагучiаб
но́рмагучiир
нойа́бир
ну́мер
нул
оваща́лъи
овоща́балъи
око́л
осто́р
отпускалъи́ссу
па́брикiа
па́пка
па́рпур
па́рта
па́рти
па́рторг
па́ртук
па́спорт
па́ста
па́чка
пави́дла
пави́ска
пагу́н
падва́л
пажа́рникi
пайту́н
пайту́нчи
пакет
пакри́шка
пала́вка
пала́н
пала́та
пала́тка
пала́ч
пала́щ
палака́т
паласма́са
паласти́нка
палате́нца
палати́нца
пали́ж
пали́тика
палити́чески
палйа́кав
палйа́кай
палйа́кал
палт/о́
палу́тарка
паме́щикi
пами́ли
памидо́р
пана́р
пана́рикi
пане́р
панта́н
пара́д
пара́зникi
пара́лич
паравака́тор
паравака́ци
паравле́ни
параво́з
парагра́ма
парагу́л
параи́гривател
парайавител
паракурату́ра
паракуро́р
паракуро́рлъи
паралета́ри
паралитариа́т
парами́шленост
парапага́нда
парапе́сор
парапи́ска
парасти́н
параце́нт
парашо́к
парашу́т
парикма́хер
парикма́херски
парк
пармали́н
партако́л
партве́л
партиза́н
партиза́налуб
партиза́нлъи
парто́
пару́з
парцига́р
паси́лка
паси́рка
пати́нка
патипо́н
патро́н
патронта́ш
патру́л
патрун
пахо́д
паши́зм
паши́ст
пе́лшер
пе́ни
пе́нси
пе́рм/а
пе́рма
пе́рсав
пе́рсай
пе́рсал
пе́рсалуб
пе́са
пе́ч
пе́шкiа
пебра́л
певра́л
педера́ци
педеративный
пел
пенсионе́р
пере́никi
перево́чик
переда́ча
передави́к
передави́ца
перз
перцо́вка
пестива́л
петру́шка
печ
печа́тат
пече́ни
пи́ва
пи́зика
пи́зкултура
пи́кус
пи́нав
пи́най
пи́нал
пи́нка
пиани́на
пигiани́р
пигiани́ралу=б
пижа́ма
пилаж
пилармо́ни
пили́тка
пило́соп
пилосо́пи
пинжа́к
пиницили́н
пире́ми
пири́мус
пиричо́ска
пирка́з
пиро́жни
пиро́к
пирсида́тил
пир’а́никi
пискулту́ра
писо́к
писто́р
пича́т
пишено́лъи
по́вар
по́варлъи
по́дпис
по́езд
по́йиз
по́рм/а
по́рма
по́ткалас
полк
поло́мба
поро́ба
поро́мисла
поро́нт
поро́пка
поро́пуск
порт
посни-ма́сла
пост
постилъи́ссу
пото́грап
почталио́н
прара́б
призи́вникi
призиде́нт
призиде́нтлъи
приссида́тел
приссида́теллъи
приступле́ни
пропсойу́з
пу́дру
пу́тк/а
пу́тка
пудбо́л
пулимйо́т
пупа́йка
пура́шка
пурго́н
пургу́н
пуре́
пуржи́н/а
пуржи́на
пуржи́наццуб
пут
путише́стви
путйо́вка
пухiе́нка
пуч
пучк/а́
пучка́
пучо́нок
ра́дива
ра́дивал
ра́йиспалком
ра́ймаг
ра́ма
рабо́чи
рага́тка
рагу́
рада́тка
ради́ст
радиа́тор
радикули́т
радио́ла
радиопереда́ча
радиопирйо́мникi
радиоста́нци
радиоте́хникi
радиоу́зел
разве́дка
разве́чик
разе́тка
райко́м
райо́н
райце́нтр/а
рак
раке́та
раси́зма
раси́ст
раскаладу́шка
распи́ска
расписа́ни
расси́йалъи
растара́та
растара́чик
рахи́т
рашпил
ращо́т
ре́зинка
ре́йк/а
ре́ктор
ре́кторлъи
ре́шка
ревалйуцианер
ревалюци
револйу́ци
реда́кци
редактор
реди́ска
резалйу́ци
рези́/н
рези́нка
рейка
рейс
рекаминда́ци
реко́рд
ректора́т
релс
ренге́н
респу́блика
рестара́н
